apertium-lit.lit.dix
    <pardef n="penki__num">
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ems</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uose</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ais</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oms</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ose</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omis</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="tr/ys__num">
      <e><p><l>ijų</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ims</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ijuose</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imis</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ijų</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ims</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ijose</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imis</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>ys<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- Participle helpers -->     
    <pardef n="dirb/ąs__pprs_act">
      <e><p><l>ąs</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" c="FIXME: check if this is really LR"><p><l>antis</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančio</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančiam</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>antį</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančiu</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančiame</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančių</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>antiems</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančius</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančiuose</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančiais</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" c="FIXME: check if this is really LR"><p><l>antys</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančios</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančiai</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančią</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančioje</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančia</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anti</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančių</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančioms</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančias</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančiose</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančiomis</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ančios</l><r><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="turėj/ęs__pp_act">
      <e><p><l>usio</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiam</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usį</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiame</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiu</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ęs</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usių</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiems</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usius</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiuose</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiais</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ę</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usios</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiai</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usią</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usioje</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usia</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usi</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usių</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usioms</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usias</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiose</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiomis</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>usiusios</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="act"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="penki"><i>penki</i><par n="penki__num"/></e>
    <e lm="trys"><i>tr</i><par n="tr/ys__num"/></e>
    <e lm="penki"><i>penki</i><par n="penki__num"/></e>
    <e lm="keturi"><i>keturi</i><par n="penki__num"/></e>
    <e lm="šeši"><i>šeši</i><par n="penki__num"/></e>
    <e lm="septyni"><i>septyni</i><par n="penki__num"/></e>
    <e lm="aštuoni"><i>aštuoni</i><par n="penki__num"/></e>
    <e lm="devyni"><i>devyni</i><par n="penki__num"/></e>
